Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1343.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1802.1. Commission for Career and Technical Education Excellence.-- (a) The Commission for Career and Technical Education Excellence is established as a departmental administrative commission under the concurrent authority of the department with all the powers and duties generally vested in and imposed upon the commissions under the act of April 9, 1929 12345678910111213141516171819202122 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929."(b) The commission shall have the following duties:(1) No later than six months after its establishment, develop guidelines to identify secondary or postsecondary courses, programs or activities may apply the credit toward the completion of a career and technical education program at the secondary or postsecondary level.(2) Provide recommendations of revision of the guidelines to the department every five years.(3) By December 31 each year, the commission shall submit a report to the Governor and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives on the status of career and technical education in this Commonwealth. The report shall:(i) Outline career and technical education programs and achievements.(ii) Assess the trends and needs in secondary and both formal and informal postsecondary career and technical education and training.(iii) Investigate and assess workforce trends of the building and construction trades industries.(iv) Consider the manner in which money is used to support career and technical education activities.(v) Highlight new initiatives and recommend future program needs.(vi) Make recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly regarding legislative or regulatory changes to improve career and technical education.(c) The commission shall consist of the following members:20260SB1343PN1742 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The Secretary of Education or a designee, who shall serve as the chairperson.(2) The Secretary of Labor or a designee.(3) The Chair of the Pennsylvania State Board of Higher Education or a designee.(4) Individuals recommended by the following organizations, appointed by the Secretary of Education:(i) Pennsylvania Commission for Community Colleges.(ii) Pennsylvania Building and Construction Trades Council.(iii) Pennsylvania Career and Technical Administrators Association.(iv) Associated Builders and Contractors.(v) Pennsylvania Manufacturers Association.(d) If members are not initially appointed within ninety days of the effective date of this subsection, or within ninety days of a vacancy, the Secretary of Education shall appoint any qualified individual to fill the vacancy.(e) The members of the commission shall serve without compensation.(f) The commission shall:(1) Meet at the call of the chair.(2) Hold its first meeting within forty-five days of the date that all members are appointed to the commission.(g) A majority of members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.(h) The department shall publish approved guidelines on the department's publicly accessible Internet website within fifteen days of approval.(i) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless 20260SB1343PN1742 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission" means the Commission for Career and Technical Education Excellence established under this section."Department" means the Department of Education of the Commonwealth.Section 2. Section 1855(b.1) introductory paragraph of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1855. Career and Technical Education Equipment Grants.--* * *(b.1) [A] Except as provided under subsection (b.2), a piece of equipment purchased with money from the grant program must satisfy the following criteria:* * *(b.1) Grants awarded under this section may be used to purchase equipment for operating a building and construction trades youth camp or building and construction trades pre-apprenticeship program under section 1919-A.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1919-A. Building and Construction Trades Pre-Apprenticeship Initiatives.-- (a) Each community college in this Commonwealth shall establish and offer to seventh and eighth grade students in this Commonwealth an annual construction and building trades youth camp in accordance with the following:(1) To raise awareness of career and technical education in secondary and postsecondary education, a community college shall partner with the following entities when establishing and offering a youth camp:(i) The department.20260SB1343PN1742 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The Department of Labor and Industry.(iii) The State Board of Higher Education.(iv) The Pennsylvania Workforce Development Board.(v) Secondary career and technical schools.(2) By December 31 each year, the department shall produce an annual report on attendance and outcomes of the youth camp established under this subsection and shall submit the report to the Governor and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives. When compiling the annual report, the department may consult with organizations outside of State government, including the Pennsylvania Commission for Community Colleges.(3) The department, in consultation with the State Board of Higher Education and the Department of Labor and Industry, shall develop guidelines to implement this subsection.(b) Each community college in this Commonwealth shall establish and operate pre-apprenticeship programs using the National Association of Building Trade Unions' Multi-Craft Core Curriculum in accordance with the following:(1) The department shall implement any necessary policy or procedure to administer the program and may consult with:(i) The Department of Labor and Industry.(ii) The Pennsylvania Commission for Community Colleges.(iii) Career and technical high schools located in this Commonwealth.(iv) Labor unions in the Pennsylvania Building and Construction Trades Council.(2) The department, in consultation with the Department of 20260SB1343PN1742 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Labor and Industry, shall develop educational materials and guidelines about establishing pre-apprenticeship programs under this subsection.(3) Within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall publish guidelines relating to this subsection on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) The Building and Construction Trades Pre-Apprenticeship Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the department in accordance with the following:(1) The purpose of the Building and Construction Trades Pre-Apprenticeship Grant Program is to award grants to applicants on a competitive basis.(2) A grant awarded under this subsection shall be used by the recipient for project costs related to the operation of a building and construction trades pre-apprenticeship program under subsection (b) or a building and construction trades youth camp under subsection (a).(3) The department shall have the following duties:(i) To establish guidelines necessary to implement this subsection, which may include consulting with the following relating to the guidelines:(A) The Department of Labor and Industry.(B) Career and technical high schools located in this Commonwealth.(C) Labor unions in the Pennsylvania Building and Construction Trades Council.(D) The Pennsylvania Commission for Community Colleges.(ii) Establish the process through which eligible applicants may apply for a grant award under this subsection.20260SB1343PN1742 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) An applicant shall submit an application on a form and in a manner as determined by the department.(5) Within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall publish the guidelines on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department" shall mean the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Youth camp" shall mean a building and construction trades youth camp as described under subsection (a).Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1343PN1742 - 7 - 12345678910111213